apertium-tlh.tlh.lexc
! this is a conversion of gtsvn version I made earlier
! I cleaned up most doccomments cause apertium aims at minimalism

! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Klingon language
! Copyright © 2015 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


Multichar_Symbols

 %<n%> 
 %<vblex%> 
 %<prn%>
 %<num%>  
 %<cnjcoo%>
 %<cnjadv%>
 %<adv%>  
 %<ij%> 

 %<sg%> 
 %<pl%>
 %<loc%>
 %<sep%>
 %<ins%>
 %<nom%>
 %<benef%>
 %<aug%> 
 %<dim%>

 %<px1sg%>
 %<px2sg%>
 %<px3sg%>
 %<px1pl%>
 %<px2pl%>
 %<px3pl%> 

 %<ind%>
 %<imp%>
 %<cont%>
 %<past%>
 %<prog%>

@P.IMP.ON@ @R.IMP.ON@ @D.IMP.ON@

 %<sg1%>
 %<sg2%>
 %<sg3%>
 %<pl1%>
 %<pl2%>
 %<pl3%>

@P.SUBJ.SG1@ @R.SUBJ.SG1@
@P.SUBJ.SG2@ @R.SUBJ.SG2@
@P.SUBJ.SG3@ @R.SUBJ.SG3@
@P.SUBJ.PL1@ @R.SUBJ.PL1@
@P.SUBJ.PL2@ @R.SUBJ.PL2@
@P.SUBJ.PL3@ @R.SUBJ.PL3@
@D.SUBJ@

  %<o_sg1%>
  %<o_sg2%>
  %<o_sg3%>
  %<o_pl1%>
  %<o_pl2%>
  %<o_pl3%>

@P.OBJ.SG1@ @R.OBJ.SG1@
@P.OBJ.SG2@ @R.OBJ.SG2@
@P.OBJ.SG3@ @R.OBJ.SG3@
@P.OBJ.PL1@ @R.OBJ.PL1@
@P.OBJ.PL2@ @R.OBJ.PL2@
@P.OBJ.PL3@ @R.OBJ.PL3@
@D.OBJ@

%<neg%>
 %<ref%>
 %<rec%> 
 %<abbr%> 
 %<punct%>
 %<sent%> 

 %<qst%>
 %<foc%>




LEXICON Root

0   Nouns   ;
0   Adverbs ;
0   Conjunctions    ;
0   Interjections   ;
0   Pronouns    ;
0   Numerals    ;
0   VerbalPrefixes    ;
0   Punctuation ;

!! There are no adjectives in Klingon language, see verbs instead.


LEXICON Adverbs

batlh%<adv%>:batlh    #  ;
bong%<adv%>:bong    #  ;
chaq%<adv%>:chaq    #  ;
chIch%<adv%>:chIch    #  ;
DaH%<adv%>:DaH    #  ;
Do’%<adv%>:Do’    #  ;
loQ%<adv%>:loQ    #  ;
nom%<adv%>:nom    #  ;
not%<adv%>:not    #  ;
pay’%<adv%>:pay’    #  ;
pIj%<adv%>:pIj    #  ;
QIt%<adv%>:QIt    #  ;
reH%<adv%>:reH    #  ;
rut%<adv%>:rut    #  ;
tugh%<adv%>:tugh    #  ;
vaj%<adv%>:vaj    #  ;
wej%<adv%>:wej    #  ;
neH%<adv%>:neH    #  ;



LEXICON Conjunctions

je%<cnjcoo%>:je      #   ;
joq%<cnjadv%>:joq    #   ;
ghap%<cnjadv%>:ghap  #   ;
’ej%<cnjcoo%>:’ej    #   ;
qoj%<cnjadv%>:qoj    #   ;
pagh%<cnjadv%>:pagh  #   ;
’ach%<cnjadv%>:’ach  #   ;
’a%<cnjadv%>:’a  #   ;


LEXICON Pronouns

jIH%<prn%>:jIH    #   ;
maH%<prn%>:maH    #   ;
soH%<prn%>:soH    #   ;
tlhIH%<prn%>:tlhIH    #   ;
ghaH%<prn%>:ghaH    #   ;
chaH%<prn%>:chaH    #   ;
’oH%<prn%>:’oH    #   ;
bIH%<prn%>:bIH    #   ;
’e’%<prn%>:’e’    #   ;

LEXICON Punctuation

! Clause boundary symbols:
    %,%<punct%>%<sent%>:%,     # ;
    %.%<punct%>%<sent%>:%.     # ;
  %.%.%<punct%>%<sent%>:%.%.   # ;
%.%.%.%<punct%>%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
    %:%<punct%>%<sent%>:%:     # ;
    %;%<punct%>%<sent%>:%;     # ;
 %!%<punct%>%<sent%>:%!     # ;
 |%<punct%>%<sent%>:%|     # ;
    %?%<punct%>%<sent%>:%?     # ;
     …%<punct%>%<sent%>:…      # ;
     ¿%<punct%>%<sent%>:¿      # ;
     ¶%<punct%>%<sent%>:¶      # ;

®%<n%>%<abbr%>:® # ;
©%<n%>%<abbr%>:© # ;


  •%<punct%>:•   # ;
  ●%<punct%>:●   # ;
  ·%<punct%>:·   # ;
   ּ%<punct%>:ּ    # ;
  ·%<punct%>:·   # ;
  -%<punct%>:-   # ; ! hyphen
 --%<punct%>:--  # ; ! double hyphen
  –%<punct%>:–   # ; ! endash
  —%<punct%>:—   # ; ! emdash
  ―%<punct%>:―   # ; ! horizontal bar
  =%<punct%>:=   # ;
  ≈%<punct%>:≈   # ;
 %%%<punct%>:%%  # ;
  &%<punct%>:&   # ;
 %"%<punct%>:%"  # ;
  '%<punct%>:'   # ;
 %*%<punct%>:%*  # ;
  +%<punct%>:+   # ;
  ±%<punct%>:±   # ;
  `%<punct%>:`   # ;
  ´%<punct%>:´   # ;
  /%<punct%>:/   # ;
+/-%<punct%>:+/- # ;
 %~%<punct%>:%~  # ;

! Paired punctuation marks

  «%<punct%>:«     # ;
  »%<punct%>:»    # ;
 %“%<punct%>:%“     # ;
 %”%<punct%>:%”    # ;
 %‘%<punct%>:%‘     # ;
 %’%<punct%>:%’    # ;
 %„%<punct%>:%„     # ;
 %‹%<punct%>:%‹     # ;
 %›%<punct%>:%›    # ;
 %(%<punct%>:%(     # ;
 %)%<punct%>:%)    # ;
 %[%<punct%>:%[     # ;
 %]%<punct%>:%]    # ;
 %{%<punct%>:%{     # ;
 %}%<punct%>:%}    # ;
 %<%<punct%>:%[%<%] # ;
 %>%<punct%>:%[%>%] # ;



 



LEXICON Augmentation

%<aug%>:’a’    Number? ;
%<dim%>:Hom    Number? ;

LEXICON Number

%<pl%>:pu’ NounQualification?  ;
%<pl%>:Du’ NounQualification?  ;
%<pl%>:mey NounQualification?  ;
%<pl%>:ray NounQualification?  ;

LEXICON NounQualification

+qoq%<foc%>:qoq    Possession? ;
+Hey%<foc%>:Hey    Possession? ;
+na%<foc%>:na      Possession? ;

LEXICON Possession

%<px1sg%>:wIj  Cases?  ;
%<px2sg%>:lIj  Cases?  ;
%<px3sg%>:Daj  Cases?  ;
%<px1pl%>:maj  Cases?  ;
%<px2pl%>:raj  Cases?  ;
%<px3pl%>:chaj Cases?  ;
%<px1sg%>:wI’  Cases?  ;
%<px2sg%>:lI’  Cases?  ;
%<px1pl%>:ma’  Cases?  ;
%<px2pl%>:ra’  Cases?  ;
+this%<foc%>:vam   Cases?  ;
+that%<foc%>:vetlh Cases?  ;

LEXICON Cases

%<loc%>:Daq    #   ;
%<sep%>:vo’    #   ;
%<ins%>:mo’    #   ;
%<benef%>:vaD    #   ;
+’e’%<foc%>:’e’    #   ;


LEXICON Augmentation?

%<cmp%>:0  Nouns ; 
0   Augmentation ;
0   Number?  ;

LEXICON Number?

0   Number  ;
%<sg%>:0   NounQualification?  ;

LEXICON NounQualification?

0   NounQualification   ;
0   Possession?  ;

LEXICON Possession?

0   Possession  ;
0   Cases?  ;

LEXICON Cases?

0       Cases   ;
%<nom%>:0  #   ;

LEXICON Nouns
bal%<n%>:bal   Augmentation?  ;
barat%<n%>:barat   Augmentation?  ;
bay%<n%>:bay   Augmentation?  ;
be’Hom%<n%>:be’Hom   Augmentation?  ;
be’nal%<n%>:be’nal   Augmentation?  ;
bep%<n%>:bep   Augmentation?  ;
bertlham%<n%>:bertlham   Augmentation?  ;
bey’%<n%>:bey’   Augmentation?  ;
bIj%<n%>:bIj   Augmentation?  ;
bIQDep%<n%>:bIQDep   Augmentation?  ;
bIraqlul%<n%>:bIraqlul   Augmentation?  ;
bI’reS%<n%>:bI’reS   Augmentation?  ;
bo’Dagh%<n%>:bo’Dagh   Augmentation?  ;
bolwI’%<n%>:bolwI’   Augmentation?  ;
boQDu’%<n%>:boQDu’   Augmentation?  ;
boqrat%<n%>:boqrat   Augmentation?  ;
botjan%<n%>:botjan   Augmentation?  ;
buq%<n%>:buq   Augmentation?  ;
cha’bIp%<n%>:cha’bIp   Augmentation?  ;
cha’DIch%<n%>:cha’DIch   Augmentation?  ;
chalqach%<n%>:chalqach   Augmentation?  ;
chan%<n%>:chan   Augmentation?  ;
chaS%<n%>:chaS   Augmentation?  ;
chechtlhutlh%<n%>:chechtlhutlh   Augmentation?  ;
chetvI’%<n%>:chetvI’   Augmentation?  ;
choljaH%<n%>:choljaH   Augmentation?  ;
chor%<n%>:chor   Augmentation?  ;
chuq’a’%<n%>:chuq’a’   Augmentation?  ;
chuyDaH%<n%>:chuyDaH   Augmentation?  ;
DaQ%<n%>:DaQ   Augmentation?  ;
Da’vI’%<n%>:Da’vI’   Augmentation?  ;
De’%<n%>:De’   Augmentation?  ;
DeS%<n%>:DeS   Augmentation?  ;
DIlyum%<n%>:DIlyum   Augmentation?  ;
DIvI’may’Duj%<n%>:DIvI’may’Duj   Augmentation?  ;
Do%<n%>:Do   Augmentation?  ;
DuDwI’%<n%>:DuDwI’   Augmentation?  ;
Duq%<n%>:Duq   Augmentation?  ;
ghab%<n%>:ghab   Augmentation?  ;
ghar%<n%>:ghar   Augmentation?  ;
ghem%<n%>:ghem   Augmentation?  ;
ghIgh%<n%>:ghIgh   Augmentation?  ;
ghItlhwI’%<n%>:ghItlhwI’   Augmentation?  ;
ghojmoq%<n%>:ghojmoq   Augmentation?  ;
ghong%<n%>:ghong   Augmentation?  ;
ghuH%<n%>:ghuH   Augmentation?  ;
Hal%<n%>:Hal   Augmentation?  ;
HaSta%<n%>:HaSta   Augmentation?  ;
Heghtay%<n%>:Heghtay   Augmentation?  ;
Hew%<n%>:Hew   Augmentation?  ;
HI’tuy%<n%>:HI’tuy   Augmentation?  ;
HoH%<n%>:HoH   Augmentation?  ;
Ho’%<n%>:Ho’   Augmentation?  ;
HoS%<n%>:HoS   Augmentation?  ;
HuD%<n%>:HuD   Augmentation?  ;
Hun%<n%>:Hun   Augmentation?  ;
Huy’%<n%>:Huy’   Augmentation?  ;
jan%<n%>:jan   Augmentation?  ;
jaw%<n%>:jaw   Augmentation?  ;
jIb%<n%>:jIb   Augmentation?  ;
jojlu’%<n%>:jojlu’   Augmentation?  ;
jonpIn%<n%>:jonpIn   Augmentation?  ;
joS%<n%>:joS   Augmentation?  ;
laH%<n%>:laH   Augmentation?  ;
latlh%<n%>:latlh   Augmentation?  ;
lengwI’%<n%>:lengwI’   Augmentation?  ;
letlh%<n%>:letlh   Augmentation?  ;
lIghonya’%<n%>:lIghonya’   Augmentation?  ;
loDHom%<n%>:loDHom   Augmentation?  ;
lo’laHbe’ghach%<n%>:lo’laHbe’ghach   Augmentation?  ;
lorbe’%<n%>:lorbe’   Augmentation?  ;
loval%<n%>:loval   Augmentation?  ;
lurDech%<n%>:lurDech   Augmentation?  ;
maHpIn%<n%>:maHpIn   Augmentation?  ;
maqoch%<n%>:maqoch   Augmentation?  ;
mavjop%<n%>:mavjop   Augmentation?  ;
mebpa’mey%<n%>:mebpa’mey   Augmentation?  ;
mep%<n%>:mep   Augmentation?  ;
mID%<n%>:mID   Augmentation?  ;
mIr%<n%>:mIr   Augmentation?  ;
mojaq%<n%>:mojaq   Augmentation?  ;
moQbara’%<n%>:moQbara’   Augmentation?  ;
muD%<n%>:muD   Augmentation?  ;
mu’qaD%<n%>:mu’qaD   Augmentation?  ;
naDev%<n%>:naDev   Augmentation?  ;
naHlet%<n%>:naHlet   Augmentation?  ;
nanwI’%<n%>:nanwI’   Augmentation?  ;
nav%<n%>:nav   Augmentation?  ;
neghvar%<n%>:neghvar   Augmentation?  ;
nepwI’%<n%>:nepwI’   Augmentation?  ;
ngat%<n%>:ngat   Augmentation?  ;
ngem%<n%>:ngem   Augmentation?  ;
ngoD%<n%>:ngoD   Augmentation?  ;
ngup%<n%>:ngup   Augmentation?  ;
nIn%<n%>:nIn   Augmentation?  ;
nIyma’%<n%>:nIyma’   Augmentation?  ;
noregh%<n%>:noregh   Augmentation?  ;
nuHHom%<n%>:nuHHom   Augmentation?  ;
nur%<n%>:nur   Augmentation?  ;
pa’%<n%>:pa’   Augmentation?  ;
patlh%<n%>:patlh   Augmentation?  ;
pemjep%<n%>:pemjep   Augmentation?  ;
pIgh%<n%>:pIgh   Augmentation?  ;
pIraqSIS%<n%>:pIraqSIS   Augmentation?  ;
poH%<n%>:poH   Augmentation?  ;
porghQeD%<n%>:porghQeD   Augmentation?  ;
puch%<n%>:puch   Augmentation?  ;
pum%<n%>:pum   Augmentation?  ;
puq%<n%>:puq   Augmentation?  ;
Qagh%<n%>:Qagh     Augmentation?    ;
Qal%<n%>:Qal   Augmentation?  ;
qa’%<n%>:qa’   Augmentation?  ;
qarDaSQa’%<n%>:qarDaSQa’   Augmentation?  ;
qa’vam%<n%>:qa’vam   Augmentation?  ;
Qay’wI’%<n%>:Qay’wI’   Augmentation?  ;
qelI’qam%<n%>:qelI’qam   Augmentation?  ;
qeq%<n%>:qeq   Augmentation?  ;
qIb%<n%>:qIb   Augmentation?  ;
QIm%<n%>:QIm   Augmentation?  ;
qItI’nga’%<n%>:qItI’nga’   Augmentation?  ;
qoD%<n%>:qoD   Augmentation?  ;
qompogh%<n%>:qompogh   Augmentation?  ;
qo’qaD%<n%>:qo’qaD   Augmentation?  ;
qoSta’%<n%>:qoSta’   Augmentation?  ;
quHvaj%<n%>:quHvaj   Augmentation?  ;
QumwI’%<n%>:QumwI’   Augmentation?  ;
qurgh%<n%>:qurgh   Augmentation?  ;
Quv%<n%>:Quv   Augmentation?  ;
ram%<n%>:ram   Augmentation?  ;
rav%<n%>:rav   Augmentation?  ;
rejmorgh%<n%>:rejmorgh   Augmentation?  ;
rIlwI’%<n%>:rIlwI’   Augmentation?  ;
rojmab%<n%>:rojmab   Augmentation?  ;
ro%<n%>:ro   Augmentation?  ;
ruq’e’vet%<n%>:ruq’e’vet   Augmentation?  ;
Sa’%<n%>:Sa’   Augmentation?  ;
SeDveq%<n%>:SeDveq   Augmentation?  ;
Seq%<n%>:Seq   Augmentation?  ;
SIbDoH%<n%>:SIbDoH   Augmentation?  ;
Soch%<n%>:Soch   Augmentation?  ;
SopwI’pa’%<n%>:SopwI’pa’   Augmentation?  ;
Sotlaw’%<n%>:Sotlaw’   Augmentation?  ;
Sup%<n%>:Sup   Augmentation?  ;
SuvwI’%<n%>:SuvwI’   Augmentation?  ;
tajHommey%<n%>:tajHommey   Augmentation?  ;
ta’%<n%>:ta’   Augmentation?  ;
tat%<n%>:tat   Augmentation?  ;
tej%<n%>:tej   Augmentation?  ;
tera’%<n%>:tera’   Augmentation?  ;
tIghla’%<n%>:tIghla’   Augmentation?  ;
tI%<n%>:tI   Augmentation?  ;
tlhagh%<n%>:tlhagh   Augmentation?  ;
tlhay%<n%>:tlhay   Augmentation?  ;
tlhIm%<n%>:tlhIm   Augmentation?  ;
tlhop%<n%>:tlhop   Augmentation?  ;
toDDuj%<n%>:toDDuj   Augmentation?  ;
toQDuj%<n%>:toQDuj   Augmentation?  ;
tu’HomI’raH%<n%>:tu’HomI’raH   Augmentation?  ;
tuq%<n%>:tuq   Augmentation?  ;
van’a’%<n%>:van’a’   Augmentation?  ;
vay’%<n%>:vay’   Augmentation?  ;
vengHom%<n%>:vengHom   Augmentation?  ;
vergh%<n%>:vergh   Augmentation?  ;
vIlInHoD%<n%>:vIlInHoD   Augmentation?  ;
vItHay’%<n%>:vItHay’   Augmentation?  ;
voQSIp%<n%>:voQSIp   Augmentation?  ;
vutwI’%<n%>:vutwI’   Augmentation?  ;
waq%<n%>:waq   Augmentation?  ;
wep%<n%>:wep   Augmentation?  ;
wIlpuq%<n%>:wIlpuq   Augmentation?  ;
woS%<n%>:woS   Augmentation?  ;
yagh%<n%>:yagh   Augmentation?  ;
yay%<n%>:yay   Augmentation?  ;
yejquv%<n%>:yejquv   Augmentation?  ;
yIntagh%<n%>:yIntagh   Augmentation?  ;
yol%<n%>:yol   Augmentation?  ;
yub%<n%>:yub   Augmentation?  ;
yuQ%<n%>:yuQ   Augmentation?  ;
